Utah, session 2026, SB228.
Section 1. Section 17C-1-102 is amended to read:17C-1-102. Definitions.As used in this title:(1)"Active project area" means a project area that has not been dissolved in accordance with Section 17C-1-702.(2)(1)"Adjusted tax increment" means the percentage of tax increment, if less than 100%, that an agency is authorized to receive:(a)for a pre-July 1, 1993, project area plan, under Section 17C-1-403, excluding tax increment under Subsection 17C-1-403(3);(b)for a post-June 30, 1993, project area plan, under Section 17C-1-404, excluding tax increment under Section 17C-1-406;(c)under a project area budget approved by a taxing entity committee; or(d)under an interlocal agreement that authorizes the agency to receive a taxing entity's tax increment.(3)(2)"Affordable housing" means housing owned or occupied by a low or moderate income family, as determined by resolution of the agency.(4)(3)"Agency" or "community reinvestment agency" means a separate body corporate and politic, created under Section 17C-1-201.5 or as a redevelopment agency or community development and renewal agency under previous law:(a)that is a political subdivision of the state;(b)that is created to undertake or promote project area development as provided in this title; and(c)whose geographic boundaries are coterminous with:(i)for an agency created by a county, the unincorporated area of the county; and(ii)for an agency created by a municipality, the boundaries of the municipality.(5)(4)"Agency funds" means money that an agency collects or receives for agency operations, implementing a project area plan or an implementation plan as defined in Section 17C-1-1001, or other agency purposes, including:(a)project area funds;(b)income, proceeds, revenue, or property derived from or held in connection with the agency's undertaking and implementation of project area development or agency-wide project development as defined in Section 17C-1-1001;(c)a contribution, loan, grant, or other financial assistance from any public or private source;(d)project area incremental revenue as defined in Section 17C-1-1001; or(e)property tax revenue as defined in Section 17C-1-1001.(6)(5)"Annual income" means the same as that term is defined in regulations of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 5.609, as amended or as superseded by replacement regulations.(7)(6)"Assessment roll" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-2-102.(8)(7)"Base taxable value" means, unless otherwise adjusted in accordance with provisions of this title, a property's taxable value as shown upon the assessment roll last equalized during the base year.(9)(8)"Base year" means, except as provided in Subsection 17C-1-402(4)(c), the year during which the assessment roll is last equalized:(a)for a pre-July 1, 1993, urban renewal or economic development project area plan, before the project area plan's effective date;(b)for a post-June 30, 1993, urban renewal or economic development project area plan, or a community reinvestment project area plan that is subject to a taxing entity committee:(i)before the date on which the taxing entity committee approves the project area budget; or(ii)if taxing entity committee approval is not required for the project area budget, before the date on which the community legislative body adopts the project area plan;(c)for a project on an inactive airport site, after the later of:(i)the date on which the inactive airport site is sold for remediation and development; or(ii)the date on which the airport that operated on the inactive airport site ceased operations; or(d)for a community development project area plan or a community reinvestment project area plan that is subject to an interlocal agreement, as described in the interlocal agreement.(10)(9)"Basic levy" means the portion of a school district's tax levy constituting the minimum basic levy under Section 59-2-902.(11)(10)"Board" means the governing body of an agency, as described in Section 17C-1-203.(12)(11)"Budget hearing" means the public hearing on a proposed project area budget required under Subsection 17C-2-201(2)(d) for an urban renewal project area budget, Subsection 17C-3-201(2)(d) for an economic development project area budget, or Subsection 17C-5-302(2)(e) for a community reinvestment project area budget.(13)(12)"Closed military base" means land within a former military base that the Defense Base Closure and Realignment Commission has voted to close or realign when that action has been sustained by the president of the United States and Congress.(14)(13)"Combined incremental value" means the combined total of all incremental values from all project areas, except project areas that contain some or all of a military installation or inactive industrial site, within the agency's boundaries under project area plans and project area budgets at the time that a project area budget for a new project area is being considered.(15)(14)"Community" means a county or municipality.(16)(15)"Community development project area plan" means a project area plan adopted under Chapter 4, Part 1, Community Development Project Area Plan.(17)(16)"Community legislative body" means the legislative body of the community that created the agency.(18)(17)"Community reinvestment project area plan" means a project area plan adopted under Chapter 5, Part 1, Community Reinvestment Project Area Plan.(19)(18)"Contest" means to file a written complaint in a court with jurisdiction under Title 78A, Judiciary and Judicial Administration, and in a county in which the agency is located if the action is filed in the district court.(20)(19)"Development impediment" means a condition of an area that meets the requirements described in Section 17C-2-303 for an urban renewal project area or Section 17C-5-405 for a community reinvestment project area.(21)(20)"Development impediment hearing" means a public hearing regarding whether a development impediment exists within a proposed:(a)urban renewal project area under Subsection 17C-2-102(1)(a)(i)(C) and Section 17C-2-302; or(b)community reinvestment project area under Section 17C-5-404.(22)(21)"Development impediment study" means a study to determine whether a development impediment exists within a survey area as described in Section 17C-2-301 for an urban renewal project area or Section 17C-5-403 for a community reinvestment project area.(22)"Dormancy period" means a period that ends six months after the project area funds collection period ends.(23)"Dormancy period extension hearing" means the public hearing on a proposed extension of a dormancy period required under Subsection 17C-1-702(2)(a).(23)(24)"Economic development project area plan" means a project area plan adopted under Chapter 3, Part 1, Economic Development Project Area Plan.(24)(25)"Fair share ratio" means the ratio derived by:(a)for a municipality, comparing the percentage of all housing units within the municipality that are publicly subsidized income targeted housing units to the percentage of all housing units within the county in which the municipality is located that are publicly subsidized income targeted housing units; or(b)for the unincorporated part of a county, comparing the percentage of all housing units within the unincorporated county that are publicly subsidized income targeted housing units to the percentage of all housing units within the whole county that are publicly subsidized income targeted housing units.(25)(26)"Family" means the same as that term is defined in regulations of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, 24 C.F.R. Section 5.403, as amended or as superseded by replacement regulations.(26)(27)"Greenfield" means land not developed beyond agricultural, range, or forestry use.(27)(28)"Hazardous waste" means any substance defined, regulated, or listed as a hazardous substance, hazardous material, hazardous waste, toxic waste, pollutant, contaminant, or toxic substance, or identified as hazardous to human health or the environment, under state or federal law or regulation.(28)(29)"Housing allocation" means project area funds allocated for housing under Section 17C-2-203, 17C-3-202, or 17C-5-307 for the purposes described in Section 17C-1-412.(29)(30)"Housing fund" means a fund created by an agency for purposes described in Section 17C-1-411 or 17C-1-412 that is comprised of:(a)project area funds, project area incremental revenue as defined in Section 17C-1-1001, or property tax revenue as defined in Section 17C-1-1001 allocated for the purposes described in Section 17C-1-411; or(b)an agency's housing allocation.(30)(31)(a)"Inactive airport site" means land that:(i)consists of at least 100 acres;(ii)is occupied by an airport:(A)(I)that is no longer in operation as an airport; or(II)(Aa)that is scheduled to be decommissioned; and(Bb)for which a replacement commercial service airport is under construction; and(B)that is owned or was formerly owned and operated by a public entity; and(iii)requires remediation because:(A)of the presence of hazardous waste or solid waste; or(B)the site lacks sufficient public infrastructure and facilities, including public roads, electric service, water system, and sewer system, needed to support development of the site.(b)"Inactive airport site" includes a perimeter of up to 2,500 feet around the land described in Subsection (30)(a)Subsection (31)(a).(31)(32)(a)"Inactive industrial site" means land that:(i)consists of at least 1,000 acres;(ii)is occupied by an inactive or abandoned factory, smelter, or other heavy industrial facility; and(iii)requires remediation because of the presence of hazardous waste or solid waste.(b)"Inactive industrial site" includes a perimeter of up to 1,500 feet around the land described in Subsection (31)(a)Subsection (32)(a).(32)(33)"Income targeted housing" means housing that is:(a)owned and occupied by a family whose annual income is at or below 120% of the median annual income for a family within the county in which the housing is located; or(b)occupied by a family whose annual income is at or below 80% of the median annual income for a family within the county in which the housing is located.(33)(34)"Incremental value" means a figure derived by multiplying the marginal value of the property located within a project area on which tax increment is collected by a number that represents the adjusted tax increment from that project area that is paid to the agency.(34)(35)"Loan fund board" means the Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund Board, established under Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 5, Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund.(35)(36)(a)" Local government building" means a building owned and operated by a community for the primary purpose of providing one or more primary community functions, including:(i)a fire station;(ii)a police station;(iii)a city hall; or(iv)a court or other judicial building.(b)" Local government building" does not include a building the primary purpose of which is cultural or recreational in nature.(36)(37)"Low-income individual" means the same as that term is defined in Section 35A-8-504.5.(37)(38)"Major transit investment corridor" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-20-102.(38)(39)"Marginal value" means the difference between actual taxable value and base taxable value.(39)(40)"Military installation project area" means a project area or a portion of a project area located within a federal military installation ordered closed by the federal Defense Base Realignment and Closure Commission.(40)(41)"Municipality" means a city or town.(41)(42)"Non-profit housing fund" means:(a)an organization that meets the definition of "housing organization" in Section 35A-8-2401;(b)a registered nonprofit that assists veterans or individuals who work in public service to achieve homeownership in the state;(c)a registered nonprofit that:(i)assists low-income individuals or families who would qualify for income targeted housing to achieve homeownership in the state; and(ii)provides direct support to help a low-income individual or a family eligible for income targeted housing to retain ownership of a home, including through rehabilitation services, lending for rehabilitation, or foreclosure mitigation counseling that results in retention of the home, refinancing, or a reverse mortgage;(d)a registered nonprofit that partners with a community to promote affordable housing for the workforce in that community; or(e)a registered nonprofit established to administer housing programs on behalf of an association representing 10 or more counties in the state.(42)(43)"Participant" means one or more persons that enter into a participation agreement with an agency.(43)(44)"Participation agreement" means a written agreement between a person and an agency under Subsection 17C-1-202(5).(44)(45)"Plan hearing" means the public hearing on a proposed project area plan required under Subsection 17C-2-102(1)(a)(vi) for an urban renewal project area plan, Subsection 17C-3-102(1)(d) for an economic development project area plan, Subsection 17C-4-102(1)(d) for a community development project area plan, or Subsection 17C-5-104(3)(e) for a community reinvestment project area plan.(45)(46)"Post-June 30, 1993, project area plan" means a project area plan adopted on or after July 1, 1993, and before May 10, 2016, whether or not amended subsequent toafter the project area plan's adoption.(46)(47)"Pre-July 1, 1993, project area plan" means a project area plan adopted before July 1, 1993, whether or not amended subsequent toafter the project area plan's adoption.(47)(48)"Private," with respect to real property, means property not owned by a public entity or any other governmental entity.(48)(49)"Project area" means the geographic area described in a project area plan within which the project area development described in the project area plan takes place or is proposed to take place.(49)(50)"Project area budget" means a multiyear projection of annual or cumulative revenues and expenses and other fiscal matters pertaining to a project area prepared in accordance with:(a)for an urban renewal project area, Section 17C-2-201;(b)for an economic development project area, Section 17C-3-201;(c)for a community development project area, Section 17C-4-204; or(d)for a community reinvestment project area, Section 17C-5-302.(50)(51)"Project area development" means activity within a project area that, as determined by the board, encourages, promotes, or provides development or redevelopment for the purpose of implementing a project area plan, including:(a)promoting, creating, or retaining public or private jobs within the state or a community;(b)providing office, manufacturing, warehousing, distribution, parking, or other facilities or improvements;(c)planning, designing, demolishing, clearing, constructing, rehabilitating, or remediating environmental issues;(d)providing residential, commercial, industrial, public, or other structures or spaces, including recreational and other facilities incidental or appurtenant to the structures or spaces;(e)altering, improving, modernizing, demolishing, reconstructing, or rehabilitating existing structures;(f)providing open space, including streets or other public grounds or space around buildings;(g)providing public or private buildings, infrastructure, structures, or improvements;(h)relocating a business;(i)improving public or private recreation areas or other public grounds;(j)eliminating a development impediment or the causes of a development impediment;(k)redevelopment as defined under the law in effect before May 1, 2006; or(l)any activity described in this Subsection (50)Subsection (51) outside of a project area that the board determines to be a benefit to the project area.(51)(52)"Project area funds" means tax increment or sales and use tax revenue that an agency receives under a project area budget adopted by a taxing entity committee or an interlocal agreement.(52)(53)"Project area funds collection period" means the period of time that:(a)begins the day on which the first payment of project area funds is distributed to an agency under a project area budget approved by a taxing entity committee or an interlocal agreement; and(b)ends the day on which the last payment of project area funds is distributed to an agency under a project area budget approved by a taxing entity committee or an interlocal agreement.(53)(54)"Project area plan" means an urban renewal project area plan, an economic development project area plan, a community development project area plan, or a community reinvestment project area plan that, after the project area plan's effective date, guides and controls the project area development.(54)(55)(a)"Property tax" means each levy on an ad valorem basis on tangible or intangible personal or real property.(b)"Property tax" includes a privilege tax imposed under Title 59, Chapter 4, Privilege Tax.(55)(56)"Public entity" means:(a)the United States, including an agency of the United States;(b)the state, including any of the state's departments or agencies; or(c)a political subdivision of the state, including a county, municipality, school district, special district, special service district, community reinvestment agency, or interlocal cooperation entity.(56)(57)"Publicly owned infrastructure and improvements" means water, sewer, storm drainage, electrical, natural gas, telecommunication, or other similar systems and lines, streets, roads, curb, gutter, sidewalk, walkways, parking facilities, public transportation facilities, or other facilities, infrastructure, and improvements benefitting the public and to be publicly owned or publicly maintained or operated.(57)(58)"Record property owner" or "record owner of property" means  the owner of real property, as shown on the records of the county in which the property is located, to whom the property's tax notice is sent.(58)(59)"Sales and use tax revenue" means revenue that is:(a)generated from a tax imposed under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act; and(b)distributed to a taxing entity in accordance with Sections 59-12-204 and 59-12-205.(59)(60)"Superfund site":(a)means an area included in the National Priorities List under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605; and(b)includes an area formerly included in the National Priorities List, as described in Subsection (59)(a)Subsection (60)(a), but removed from the list following remediation that leaves on site the waste that caused the area to be included in the National Priorities List.(60)(61)"Survey area" means a geographic area designated for study by a survey area resolution to determine whether:(a)one or more project areas within the survey area are feasible; or(b)a development impediment exists within the survey area.(61)(62)"Survey area resolution" means a resolution adopted by a board that designates a survey area.(62)(63)"Taxable value" means:(a)the taxable value of all real property a county assessor assesses in accordance with Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 3, County Assessment, for the current year;(b)the taxable value of all real and personal property the commission assesses in accordance with Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 2, Assessment of Property, for the current year; and(c)the year end taxable value of all personal property a county assessor assesses in accordance with Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 3, County Assessment, contained on the prior year's tax rolls of the taxing entity.(63)(64)(a)"Tax increment" means the difference between:(i)the amount of property tax revenue generated each tax year by a taxing entity from the area within a project area designated in the project area plan as the area from which tax increment is to be collected, using the current assessed value of the property and each taxing entity's current certifiedfinal tax rate as defined in Section 59-2-92417C-1-1001; and(ii)the amount of property tax revenue that would be generated from that same area using the base taxable value of the property and each taxing entity's current certifiedfinal tax rate as defined in Section 59-2-92417C-1-1001.(b)"Tax increment" does not include taxes levied and collected under Section 59-2-1602 on or after January 1, 1994, upon the taxable property in the project area unless:(i)the project area plan was adopted before May 4, 1993, whether or not the project area plan was subsequently amended; and(ii)the taxes were pledged to support bond indebtedness or other contractual obligations of the agency.(64)(65)"Taxing entity" means a public entity that:(a)levies a tax on property located within a project area; or(b)imposes a sales and use tax under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.(65)(66)"Taxing entity committee" means a committee representing the interests of taxing entities, created in accordance with Section 17C-1-402.(66)(67)"Unincorporated" means not within a municipality.(67)(68)"Urban renewal project area plan" means a project area plan adopted under Chapter 2, Part 1, Urban Renewal Project Area Plan.(68)(69)"Veteran" means the same as that term is defined in Section 68-3-12.5.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 17C-1-702 is amended to read:17C-1-702. Project area dissolution -- Dormancy period extension -- Unexpended funds.(1)A project area is dissolved: (a)except as provided in Subsection (2) or (3), on the day on which the dormancy period ends; or(b)eight years after the day on which an agency approved the project area if the project area's collection period has not started.(2)Before the day on which a dormancy period ends, an agency may extend the dormancy period once, for a period not to exceed two years, if:(a)the agency holds a public hearing to consider the extension, in accordance with Title 17C, Chapter 1, Part 8, Hearing and Notice Requirements;(b)the agency adopts a resolution at the public hearing described in Subsection (2)(a) that includes:(i)the name of the project area;(ii)a project area map or boundary description;(iii)a description of the progress the agency has made implementing the project area plan;(iv)a description of the unique circumstances existing in the project area that require that the dormancy period be extended; and(v)the day on which the extended dormancy period will end and the project area will be dissolved; and(c)the community legislative body adopts an ordinance that includes the information described in Subsection (2)(b).(1)(3)Regardless of when a project area funds collectiondormancy period ends, the project area remains in existence untilan agency may dissolve a project area early if:(a)the agency adopts a resolution dissolving the project area; and that includes:(i)the name of the project area; and(ii)a project area map or boundary description; and(b)the community legislative body adopts an ordinance dissolving the project area that includes the information described in Subsection (3)(a).(2)The ordinance described in Subsection (1)(b) shall include:(a)the name of the project area; and(b)a project area map or boundary description.(3)(4)Within 30 days after the day on which the community legislative body adopts an ordinance described in Subsection (1)(b)Subsection (2)(c) or (3)(b), the community legislative body shall:(a)submit a copy of the ordinance to the county recorder of the county in which the dissolved project area is located; and(b)mail or electronically submit a copy of the ordinance to the county auditor, the State Tax Commission, the State Board of Education, and each taxing entity that levies or imposes a tax on property within the dissolved project area.(4)(a)As used in this Subsection (4), "dormancy period" means a period that ends the later of:(i)five years after the project area funds collection period ends; and(ii)five years after the effective date of this section.(b)(5)An agency with project area funds remaining at the end of the dormancy period shall use the unexpended funds as provided in Subsection 17C-1-412(1)(b)return a proportionate share of the unexpended funds to each taxing entity.(6)Notwithstanding Subsections (1) and (2), a project area that allocated project area funds and began a dormancy period before May 6, 2026, shall:(a)be dissolved five years after the day on which the project area began the dormancy period; and(b)distribute any unexpended funds in accordance with Subsection (5).

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 17C-1-803 is amended to read:17C-1-803. Continuing a hearing.Subject to Section 17C-1-804, the board may continue:(1)a development impediment hearing;(2)a plan hearing;(3)a budget hearing; or(4)a dormancy period extension hearing; or(4)(5)a combined hearing under Section 17C-1-802.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 17C-1-805 is amended to read:17C-1-805. Agency to provide notice of hearings.(1)Each agency shall provide notice, in accordance with this part, of each:(a)development impediment hearing;(b)plan hearing; or(c)budget hearing; or(d)dormancy period extension hearing.(2)The notice required under Subsection (1) may be combined with the notice required for any of the other hearings if the hearings are combined under Section 17C-1-802.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 17C-1-810 is enacted to read:17C-1-810. Additional requirements for notice of a dormancy period extension hearing.Each notice under Section 17C-1-806 of a dormancy period extension hearing shall include a statement that an individual who objects to the proposed dormancy period extension may appear before the board at the hearing to explain why the individual believes the proposed dormancy period should not be extended.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 17C-5-306 is amended to read:17C-5-306. Amending a community reinvestment project area budget.(1)Except as provided in Section 17C-1-1002 and before a project area funds collection period ends, an agency may amend a community reinvestment project area budget in accordance with this section.(2)To amend a community reinvestment project area budget, an agency shall:(a)provide notice and hold a public hearing on the proposed amendment in accordance with Chapter 1, Part 8, Hearing and Notice Requirements;(b)(i)if the community reinvestment project area budget required approval from a taxing entity committee, obtain the taxing entity committee's approval; or(ii)if the community reinvestment project area budget required an interlocal agreement with a taxing entity, obtain approval from the taxing entity that is a party to the interlocal agreement; and(c)at the public hearing described in Subsection (2)(a) or at a subsequent board meeting, by resolution, adopt the community reinvestment project area budget amendment.(3)If an agency proposes a community reinvestment project area budget amendment under which the agency is paid a greater proportion of tax increment from the community reinvestment project area than provided under the community reinvestment project area budget, the notice described in Subsection (2)(a) shall state:(a)the percentage of tax increment paid under the community reinvestment project area budget; and(b)the proposed percentage of tax increment paid under the community reinvestment project area budget amendment.(4)(a)If an agency proposes a community reinvestment project area budget amendment that extends a project area funds collection period, before a taxing entity committee or taxing entity may provide the taxing entity committee's or taxing entity's approval described in Subsection (2)(b), the agency shall provide to the taxing entity committee or taxing entity:(i)the reasons why the extension is required;(ii)a description of the project area development for which project area funds received by the agency under the extension will be used;(iii)a statement of whether the project area funds received by the agency under the extension will be used within an activeapproved project area or a proposed project area; and(iv)a revised community reinvestment project area budget that includes:(A)the annual and total amounts of project area funds that the agency receives under the extension; and(B)the number of years that are added to each project area funds collection period under the extension.(b)With respect to an amendment described in Subsection (4)(a), a taxing entity committee or taxing entity may consent to:(i)allow an agency to use project area funds received under an extension within a different project area from which the project area funds are generated; or(ii)alter the base taxable value in connection with a community reinvestment project area budget extension.(5)If an agency proposes a community reinvestment project area budget amendment that reduces the base taxable value of the project area due to the removal of a parcel under Subsection 17C-5-112(5)(b), an agency may amend a project area budget without:(a)complying with Subsection (2)(a); and(b)obtaining taxing entity committee or taxing entity approval described in Subsection (2)(b).(6)(a)A person may contest an agency's adoption of a community reinvestment project area budget amendment within 30 days after the day on which the agency adopts the community reinvestment project area budget amendment.(b)After the 30-day period described in Subsection (6)(a), a person may not contest:(i)the agency's adoption of the community reinvestment project area budget amendment;(ii)a payment to the agency under the community reinvestment project area budget amendment; or(iii)the agency's use of project area funds received under the community reinvestment project area budget amendment.

Section 7:
Section 7.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.